src/interj_myv-lex.txt
LEXICON INTERJ
! Interj + Imp
адя+Interj+Imp:адя Interj-Imp ;
адя+Interj+Imp+2Sg+ClitKa:адяка ImpClitic ;
азё+Interj+Imp:азё Interj-Imp ;
азё+Interj+Imp+2Sg+ClitKa:азёка ImpClitic ;
азё+Interj+Imp+2Sg+ClitKa:азька ImpClitic ;
ва+Interj+Imp:ва Interj-Imp ;
на+Interj+Imp:на Interj-Imp ;
пандя+Interj+Imp:пандя Interj-Imp ;
ужо+Interj+Imp:ужо Interj-Imp ;
ужо+Interj+Imp+2Sg+ClitKa:ужока ImpClitic ;
эрь+Interj+Imp:эрь Interj-Imp ;
ярь+Interj+Imp:ярь Interj-Imp ;
я+Interj+Imp:я Interj-Imp ;
